en: Pizzelle Makers
xx: Pizzelle Makers
cs: Lisy na pizzellu
da: Vaffelmaskiner
de: Pizzelle-Eisen
es: Máquinas para hacer pizellas o ferratellas
fr: Appareils à gaufres
it: Piastre per pizzelle
ja: ピッツェルメーカー
nl: Pizzelle-ijzers
no: Pizelle-jern
pl: Maszynki do pizzelle
pt: Máquinas para fazer pizza
ru: Сковороды для приготовления итальянских вафель
sv: Pizzellemaskiner
tr: Pizzelle Makineleri

en: Pretzel Makers
xx: Pretzel Makers
cs: Přístroj na přípravu preclíků
da: Saltkringlemaskiner
de: Brezelbackautomat
es: Máquinas de pretzels
fr: Machines à bretzels
it: Macchine per pretzel
ja: プレッツェルメーカー
nl: Krakelingmachines
no: Pretzel-jern
pl: Maszynki do precli
pt: Máquinas de pretzels
ru: Печки для кренделей
sv: Pretzelmaskiner
tr: Pretzel Makineleri

en: Sandwich Makers
xx: Sandwich Makers
cs: Sendvičovače
da: Sandwichmaskiner
de: Sandwichtoaster
es: Sandwicheras
fr: Machines à paninis et croques
it: Macchine per sandwich
ja: サンドイッチメーカー
nl: Tosti-ijzers
no: Sandwichjern
pl: Maszynki do kanapek
pt: Sanduicheiras
ru: Бутербродницы
sv: Smörgåsgrillar
tr: Sandviç Makineleri

en: Toasters
xx: Toasters
cs: Topinkovače
da: Brødristere
de: Toaster
es: Tostadores
fr: Grille-pains, Toaster
it: Tostapane
ja: トースター
nl: Broodroosters
no: Brødristere
pl: Tostery
pt: Torradeiras
ru: Тостеры
sv: Brödrostar
tr: Tost Makineleri

en: Tortilla & Flatbread Makers
xx: Tortilla & Flatbread Makers
cs: Přístroje na výrobu tortill a quesadillas
da: Tortilla- og fladbrødsmaskiner
de: Quesadilla- & Tortilla-Maker
es: Máquinas para hacer quesadillas y tortillas
fr: Appareils à quesadillas et tortillas
it: Piastre per quesadilla e tortilla
ja: トルティーヤメーカー
nl: Quesadilla- en tortilla-apparaten
no: Tortilla-jern
pl: Maszynki do tortilli i pity
pt: Formas para quesadillas e  tortillas
ru: Сковороды для приготовления тортилий и кесадилий
sv: Tortilla- och tunnbrödsmaskiner
tr: Tortilla ve Bazlama Makineleri

en: Waffle Irons
xx: Waffle Irons
cs: Vaflovače
da: Vaffeljern
de: Waffeleisen
es: Gofreras
fr: Gaufriers
it: Piastre waffle
ja: ワッフルメーカー
nl: Wafelijzers
no: Vaffeljern
pl: Waflownice
pt: Tostadores para waffles
ru: Вафельницы
sv: Våffeljärn
tr: Waffle Izgaraları

en: Trash Compactors
xx: Trash Compactors
cs: Lisy na odpad
da: Skraldkomprimering
de: Müllpressen
es: Trituradores de basura
fr: Compacteurs de déchets ménagers
it: Compattatori rifiuti
ja: ゴミ圧縮機
nl: Afvalpersen
no: Søppelkompaktorer
pl: Zgniatarki do śmieci
pt: Compactadores de lixo
ru: Прессы для мусора
sv: Avfallspressar
tr: Çöp Kompaktörleri

en: Vacuum Sealers
xx: Vacuum Sealers
cs: Přístroje na vakuové balení potravin
da: Vakuumforseglere
de: Vakuumierer
es: Envasados al vacío
fr: Emballages sous vide
it: Sigillatori sotto vuoto
ja: 真空パック器
nl: Vacuümapparaten
no: Vakuumforseglere
pl: Pakowarki próżniowe
pt: Seladoras a vácuo
ru: Вакуумные упаковщики
sv: Vakuumförpackare
tr: Yiyecek Poşeti Vakumlayıcıları

en: Water Coolers
xx: Water Coolers
cs: Chladiče vody
da: Vandkølere
de: Trinkwasserspender
es: Dispensadores enfriadores de agua
fr: Refroidisseurs d'eau
it: Erogatori d'acqua
ja: ウォータークーラー
nl: Waterkoelers
no: Vannavkjølere
pl: Schładzacze do wody
pt: Refrigeradores de água
ru: Кулеры для воды
sv: Vattenkylare
tr: Su Soğutucuları

en: Water Filters
xx: Water Filters
cs: Vodní filtry
da: Vandfiltre
de: Wasserfilter
es: Filtros de agua
fr: Filtres à eau
it: Filtri acqua
ja: 浄水器
nl: Waterfilters
no: Vannfiltre
pl: Filtry do wody
pt: Filtros de água
ru: Фильтры для воды
sv: Vattenfilter
tr: Su Filtreleri

en: Wine Fridges
xx: Wine Fridges
cs: Chladničky na víno
da: Vinkøleskabe
de: Weinkühlschränke
es: Neveras para vino
fr: Caves à vin
it: Refrigeratori per vini
ja: ワインセラー
nl: Wijnkoelkasten
no: Vinkjølere
pl: Lodówki do wina
pt: Adegas de vinho climatizadas
ru: Винные холодильники
sv: Vinkylar
tr: Şarap Soğutma Dolapları

en: Yogurt Makers
xx: Yogurt Makers
cs: Jogurtovače
da: Yoghurtmaskiner
de: Joghurtmaschinen
es: Yogurteras
fr: Yaourtières
it: Macchine yogurt
ja: ヨーグルトメーカー
nl: Yoghurtmakers
no: Yoghurtmaskiner
pl: Maszynki do jogurtu
pt: Máquinas de fazer iogurte
ru: Йогуртницы
sv: Yogurtmaskiner
tr: Yoğurt Makineleri

en: Kitchen Tools & Utensils, Cooking equipment
xx: Kitchen Tools & Utensils
cs: Kuchyňské nástroje a vybavení
da: Køkkenredskaber
de: Küchenhelfer & -utensilien
es: Herramientas y utensilios de cocina
fr: Ustensiles et accessoires de cuisine, Ustensile de cuisine
it: Strumenti e utensili cucina
ja: キッチン用品・調理器具
nl: Keukengereedschap
no: Kjøkkenredskaper
pl: Narzędzia i sprzęty kuchenne
pt: Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha
ru: Кухонные приборы и утварь
sv: Köksverktyg och köksgeråd
tr: Mutfak Gereçleri ve Aletleri

en: Aprons
xx: Aprons
cs: Zástěry
da: Forklæder
de: Schürzen
es: Delantales
fr: Tabliers
it: Grembiuli
ja: エプロン
nl: Schorten
no: Forklær
pl: Fartuszki
pt: Aventais
ru: Фартуки
sv: Förkläden
tr: Mutfak Önlükleri

en: Baking Peels
xx: Baking Peels
cs: Pekařské lopaty
da: Bagespader
de: Backschaufeln
es: Palas de horno
fr: Planches à pizza
it: Pale da fornaio
ja: ピザピール
nl: Pizzascheppen
no: Bakefjøler
pl: Łopaty do pieca
pt: Tábuas para assar
ru: Пекарские лопаты
sv: Pizzaspadar
tr: Fırıncı Kürekleri

en: Basters
xx: Basters
cs: Pečicí obaly
da: Køkkenpipetter
de: Bratenspritzen
es: Pipetas para salsas
fr: Poires à jus
it: Lardatoi
ja: ベイスター
nl: Pipetten voor bedruipen
no: Kjøkkendryppere
pl: Pipety do polewania mięsa
pt: Colheres para gordura
ru: Кухонные спринцовки
sv: Ösningsredskap
tr: Damlalıklar

en: Basting Brushes
xx: Basting Brushes
cs: Štětce na pečení
da: Køkkenpensler
de: Backpinsel
es: Pinceles de cocina
fr: Pinceaux à badigeonner
it: Spazzole per grasso
ja: はけ
nl: Bakkwasten
no: Bakepensler
pl: Pędzle spożywcze
pt: Pincéis para assados
ru: Кисточки для смазывания
sv: Ösningspenslar
tr: Yumurta Fırçaları

en: Beverage Dispensers
xx: Beverage Dispensers
cs: Dávkovače na nápoje
da: Drikkevarer Dispenser
de: Getränkespender
es: Dispensadores de bebidas
fr: Distributeurs de boissons
it: Erogatori di bevande
ja: ドリンクディスペンサー
nl: Drankdispensers
no: Drikkedispensere
pl: Dystrybutory do napojów
pt: Dispensadores de bebidas
ru: Диспенсеры напитков
sv: Dryckesautomater
tr: İçecek Sebilleri

en: Cake Decorating Supplies
xx: Cake Decorating Supplies
cs: Potřeby pro zdobení cukroví
da: Kagedekoration – tilbehør
de: Kuchen-Dekorationsbedarf
es: Productos para la decoración de pasteles
fr: Fournitures pour décoration de gâteaux
it: Forniture decorazioni torte
ja: 製菓デコレーション用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor taartversiering
no: Utstyr for kakepynting
pl: Przybory do dekorowania ciast
pt: Suprimentos para decoração de bolos
ru: Украшения для тортов
sv: Utrustning för tårtdekoration
tr: Pasta Süsleme Malzemeleri

en: Cake Servers
xx: Cake Servers
cs: Lopatky na dorty
da: Kageservering
de: Tortenheber
es: Palas para pasteles
fr: Pelles à gâteaux
it: Palette da torta
ja: ケーキサーバー
nl: Taartscheppen
no: Kakespader
pl: Łopatki do ciast
pt: Espátulas para bolo
ru: Лопатки для тортов
sv: Tårtspadar
tr: Pasta Servis Gereçleri